Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVIII Witnesses, Evidence, Notaries, Commissioners of Foreign Deeds, and Legal Notices
CHAPTER 423 Notaries Public and Commissioners of Foreign Deeds

423.010.
Appointment, term, and qualifications of notaries — County clerk has powers of notary when acting in capacity as clerk. [Repealed]

History.

3721: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 45, § 1; 1968, ch. 100, § 22; 1974, ch. 235, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 6, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 524, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 204, § 12, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 486, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2002, ch. 231, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 186, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; repealed by 2019 ch. 86, § 50, effective January 1, 2020.

423.020.
Notary may act in any county — Certification of notary’s authority. [Repealed]

History.

3721a: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 162, § 1; 1990, ch. 88, § 85; 2006, ch. 255, § 34, effective January 1, 2007; repealed by 2019 ch. 86, § 50, effective January 1, 2020.

423.030.
Protests to be recorded — Copies as evidence. [Repealed]

History.

3723; repealed by 2019 ch. 86, § 50, effective January 1, 2020.

423.040.
Notice of dishonor — To whom sent. [Repealed]

History.

3725; repealed by 2019 ch. 86, § 50, effective January 1, 2020.

423.050.
Records of notary to be delivered to county clerk, when. [Repealed]

History.

3724; 1990, ch. 88, § 86; repealed by 2019 ch. 86, § 50, effective January 1, 2020.

423.060.
Foreign notary — When protest by is evidence. [Repealed]

History.

3726; repealed by 2019 ch. 86, § 50, effective January 1, 2020.

423.070.
Commissioners of foreign deeds — Appointment, term. [Repealed]

History.

389; repealed by 2019 ch. 86, § 50, effective January 1, 2020.

423.080.
Powers of commissioners. [Repealed]

History.

390, 391: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 386, § 99; repealed by 2019 ch. 86, § 50, effective January 1, 2020.

423.110.
Recognition of notarial acts performed outside this state.

For the purposes of KRS

423.110

to

423.190

, “notarial acts” means acts which the laws and regulations of this state authorize notaries public of this state to perform, including the administering of oaths and affirmations, taking proof of execution and acknowledgments of instruments, and attesting documents. Notarial acts may be performed outside this state for use in this state with the same effect as if performed by a notary public of this state by the following persons authorized pursuant to the laws and regulations of other governments in addition to any other person authorized by the laws and regulations of this state:

A notary public authorized to perform notarial acts in the place in which the act is performed;

A judge, clerk, or deputy clerk of any court of record in the place in which the notarial act is performed;

An officer of the foreign service of the United States, a consular agent, or any other person authorized by regulation of the United States Department of State to perform notarial acts in the place in which the act is performed;

A commissioned officer in active service with the Armed Forces of the United States and any other person authorized by regulation of the Armed Forces to perform notarial acts if the notarial act is performed for one (1) of the following or his dependents: a merchant seaman of the United States, a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, or any other person serving with or accompanying the Armed Forces of the United States;

Any other person authorized to perform notarial acts in the place in which the act is performed; or

A person, either a resident or a nonresident of Kentucky, who is appointed by the Governor of Kentucky to perform notarial acts in or outside this state covering writings prepared for recordation in this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 131, § 1, July 1, 1970; 1976, ch. 65, § 1; 1982, ch. 144, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

423.120.
Authentication of authority of officer. [Repealed.]

423.130.
Certificate of person taking acknowledgment.

The person taking an acknowledgment shall certify that:

The person acknowledging appeared before him and acknowledged he executed the instrument; and

The person acknowledging was known to the person taking the acknowledgment or that the person taking the acknowledgment had satisfactory evidence that the person acknowledging was the person described in and who executed the instrument.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 131, § 3, July 1, 1970.

423.140.
Recognition of certificate of acknowledgment.

The form of a certificate of acknowledgment used by a person whose authority is recognized under KRS

423.110

shall be accepted in this state if:

The certificate is in a form prescribed by the laws or regulations of this state;

The certificate is in a form prescribed by the laws or regulations applicable in the place in which the acknowledgment is taken; or

The certificate contains the words “acknowledged before me,” or their substantial equivalent.

History.

Enact. Acts. 1970, ch. 131, § 4, July 1, 1970.

423.150.
Certificate of acknowledgment.

The words “acknowledged before me” mean:

That the person acknowledging appeared before the person taking the acknowledgment;

That he acknowledged he executed the instrument;

That, in the case of:

A natural person, he executed the instrument for the purposes therein stated;

A corporation, the officer or agent acknowledged he held the position or title set forth in the instrument and certificate, he signed the instrument on behalf of the corporation by proper authority, and the instrument was the act of the corporation for the purpose therein stated;

A partnership, the partner or agent acknowledged he signed the instrument on behalf of the partnership by proper authority and he executed the instrument as the act of the partnership for the purpose therein stated;

A person acknowledging as principal by an attorney in fact, he executed the instrument by proper authority as the act of the principal for the purposes therein stated;

A person acknowledging as a public officer, trustee, administrator, guardian, or other representative, he signed the instrument by proper authority and he executed the instrument in the capacity and for the purposes therein stated; and

That the person taking the acknowledgment either knew or had satisfactory evidence that the person acknowledging was the person named in the instrument or certificate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 131, § 5, July 1, 1970.

423.160.
Short forms of acknowledgment.

The forms of acknowledgment set forth in this section may be used and are sufficient for their respective purposes under any law of this state. The forms shall be known as “Statutory Short Forms of Acknowledgment” and may be referred to by that name. The authorization of the forms in this section does not preclude the use of other forms.

For an individual acting in his own right: State of County of The foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me this (date) by (name of person acknowledged). (Signature of person taking acknowledgment) (Title or rank) (Serial number, if any) (2) For a corporation: State of County of The foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me this (date) by (name of officer or agent, title of officer or agent) of (name of corporation acknowledging) a (state or place of incorporation) corporation, on behalf of the corporation. (Signature of person taking acknowledgment) (Title or rank) (Serial number, if any) (3) For a partnership: State of County of The foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me this (date) by (name of acknowledging partner or agent), partner (or agent) on behalf of (name of partnership), a partnership. (Signature of person taking acknowledgment) (Title or rank) (Serial number, if any) (4) For an individual acting as principal by an attorney in fact: State of County of The foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me this (date) by (name of attorney in fact) as attorney in fact on behalf of (name of principal). (Signature of person taking acknowledgment) (Title or rank) (Serial number, if any) (5) By any public officer, trustee, or personal representative: State of County of The foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me this (date) by (name and title of position). (Signature of person taking acknowledgment) (Title or rank) (Serial number, if any)

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 131, § 6, July 1, 1970.

423.170.
Acknowledgments not affected by KRS 423.110 to 423.190.

A notarial act performed prior to July 1, 1970, is not affected by KRS

423.110

to

423.190

. KRS

423.110

to

423.190

provide an additional method of proving notarial acts. Nothing in KRS 423.110 to 423.190 diminishes or invalidates the recognition accorded to notarial acts by other laws or regulations of this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 131, § 7, July 1, 1970.

423.180.
Uniformity of interpretation.

KRS

423.110

to

423.190

shall be so interpreted as to make uniform the laws of those states which enact it.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 131, § 8, July 1, 1970.

423.190.
Short title.

KRS

423.110

to

423.190

may be cited as the “Uniform Recognition of Acknowledgments Act.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 131, § 9, July 1, 1970.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Notary Public, § 21.00.

423.200.
Admission of documents to the public record.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any certificate of an acknowledgment given and certified as provided by KRS

423.300

to

423.455

or as provided by those sections and other provisions of law, together with the instrument acknowledged, may be admitted to the public record provided for the type of instrument so acknowledged, and any instrument required to be sworn to or affirmed in order to be recorded may be admitted to record upon a jurat recognized under the provisions of KRS

423.300

to

423.455

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 170, § 1, March 25, 1972; 2019 ch. 86, § 37, effective January 1, 2020.

423.300.
Definitions for KRS 423.300 to 423.455.

As used in KRS

423.300

to

423.455

:

“Acknowledgment” means a declaration by an individual before a notarial officer that the individual has signed a record for the purpose stated in the record and, if the record is signed in a representative capacity, that the individual signed the record with proper authority and signed it as the act of the individual or entity identified in the record;

“Acknowledged before me” or “appears before me” means being in:

The same physical location as another individual person and close enough to see, hear, communicate with, and exchange credentials with that person; or

A different physical location from another person but able to see, hear, and communicate with that person by means of communication technology;

“Communication technology” means an electronic device or process that:

Allows a notary public and a remotely located individual to communicate with each other simultaneously by sight and sound; and

When necessary and consistent with other applicable law, facilitates communication with a remotely located individual with a vision, hearing, or speech impairment;

“Credential” means a non-expired record issued by a government which bears an individual’s photo and which evidences an individual’s identity;

“Credential analysis” means a process or service that meets the standards adopted under KRS 423.355(7) and

423.415

by which a third person provides confidence as to the validity of a government-issued identification credential through review of public and proprietary data sources;

“Dynamic knowledge-based authentication assessment” means an identity assessment that is based on a set of questions formulated from public or private data sources for which the signer of an electronic record has not provided a prior answer;

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities;

“Electronic notarization” means a notarial act performed with respect to an electronic record by means of communication technology that meets the standards adopted under KRS 423.355(7) and

423.415

;

“Electronic signature” means an electronic symbol, sound, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by an individual with the intent to sign the record;

“Foreign state” means a jurisdiction other than the United States, a state, or a federally recognized Indian tribe;

“Identity proofing” means, in the use of communication technology, a process or service that meets standards adopted under KRS 423.355(7) and

423.415

by which a third person provides confidence as to the identity of an individual through review of personal information from public or proprietary data sources;

“In a representative capacity” means acting as:

An authorized officer, agent, partner, trustee, or other representative for a person other than an individual;

A public officer, personal representative, guardian, or other representative, in the capacity stated in a record;

An agent or attorney-in-fact for a principal; or

An authorized representative of another in any other capacity;

“Notarial act” means an act, whether performed with respect to a tangible or electronic record, that a notarial officer may perform under KRS

423.310

and any other law of the Commonwealth;

“Notarial officer” means a notary public or other individual authorized to perform a notarial act;

“Notary public” means an individual commissioned to perform a notarial act by the Secretary of State. This term does not include other notarial officers who may perform a notarial act in this state;

“Official stamp” means a physical image affixed to or embossed on a tangible record or an electronic image attached to or logically associated with an electronic record, including an official notary seal;

“Online notary public” means a notary public who has registered with the Secretary of State, pursuant to any standards and rules adopted under KRS

423.390

and

423.415

, to perform electronic notarizations under KRS

423.300

to

423.455

;

“Outside the United States” means a location outside the geographic boundaries of the United States, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, and any territory, insular possession, or other location subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, statutory trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;

“Remotely located individual” means an individual who is not in the physical presence of the notary public who performs a notarial act or is appearing remotely before the notary;

“Remote presentation” means transmission to an online notary public through communication technology of an image of a government-issued identification credential that is of sufficient quality to enable the online notary public to identify the individual seeking the online notary public’s services and to perform credential analysis;

“Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record, to:

Execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

Attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process;

“Signature” means a tangible symbol or an electronic signature that evidences the signing of a record;

“Stamping device” means:

A physical device capable of affixing to or embossing on a tangible record an official stamp; or

An electronic device or process capable of attaching to or logically associating with an electronic record an official stamp;

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States; and

“Verification on oath or affirmation” means a declaration, made by an individual on oath or affirmation before a notarial officer, that a statement in a record is true.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 1, effective January 1, 2020.

423.305.
Application of KRS 423.300 to 423.455.

KRS

423.300

to

423.455

applies to a notarial act performed on or after January 1, 2020.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 2, effective January 1, 2020.

423.310.
Notarial acts — Tangible and electronic records — Online notary — Prohibited acts — Tangible copy of electronic record.

A notarial officer may perform the following notarial acts:

Take acknowledgments;

Administer oaths and affirmations;

Take verifications of statements on oath or affirmation;

Certify that a copy of any document, other than a document that is recorded or in the custody of any federal, state, or local governmental agency, office, or court, is a true copy;

Certify depositions of witnesses;

Make or note a protest of a negotiable instrument;

Witness or attest signatures; and

Perform any notarial act authorized by a law of the Commonwealth other than KRS

423.300

to

423.455

.

A notary public may perform any of the notarial acts listed in subsection (1) of this section with respect to tangible records and electronic records.

Upon registration with the Secretary of State, an online notary may perform any of the notarial acts listed in subsection (1) of this section as an electronic notarization.

A notarial officer shall not perform a notarial act with respect to a record to which the notarial officer or the notarial officer’s spouse or other member of the notarial officer’s immediate family is a party, or in which any of those individuals has a direct beneficial interest. A notarial act performed in violation of this subsection is voidable.

A notarial officer may certify that a tangible copy of an electronic record is an accurate copy of the electronic record.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 3, effective January 1, 2020.

423.315.
Determination of individual’s identity and signature — Protest of negotiable instrument.

A notarial officer who takes an acknowledgment of a record, takes a verification of a statement on oath or affirmation, or witnesses or attests to a signature, shall determine, from personal knowledge or satisfactory evidence of the identity of the individual, that the individual appearing before the notarial officer has the identity claimed and that the signature on the record is the signature of the individual. A notarial officer who makes or notes a protest of a negotiable instrument shall determine the matters as set forth in KRS

355.3-505

(2).

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 4, effective January 1, 2020.

423.320.
Personal appearance before notarial officer.

If a notarial act relates to a statement made in or a signature executed on a record, the individual making the statement or executing the signature shall appear personally before the notarial officer.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

423.325.
Personal knowledge and satisfactory evidence of identity — Use of communication technology — Additional information.

A notarial officer has personal knowledge of the identity of an individual appearing before the officer if the individual is personally known to the officer through dealings sufficient to provide reasonable certainty that the individual has the identity claimed.

A notarial officer has satisfactory evidence of the identity of an individual appearing before the officer if the officer can identify the individual by means of one (1) of the following credentials:

A non-expired passport, driver’s license, or government-issued identification card;

Another current form of government identification issued to an individual, which contains the signature and a photograph of the individual, and is satisfactory to the notarial officer; or

If the means presented in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection are unavailable, verification on oath or affirmation of a credible witness personally appearing before the notarial officer and known to the notarial officer or whom the notarial officer can identify on the basis of a current passport, driver’s license, or government-issued identification card.

Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, in performing an electronic notarization, an online notary public has satisfactory evidence of the identity of an individual appearing before the online notary public if the online notary public can identify the individual through the use of communication technology that meets the requirements of this section and the administrative regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State under KRS 423.355(7) and

423.415

, and by the following:

The online notary public’s personal knowledge of the individual; or

Each of the following:

Remote presentation by the individual of a government-issued identification credential specified in this section that contains the signature and photograph of the individual;

Credential analysis of the identification credential described by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph; and

Identity proofing of the individual, which may include a dynamic knowledge-based authentication assessment; or

A valid public key certificate that complies with the administrative regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State pursuant to KRS

423.415

.

A notarial officer may require an individual to provide additional information or identification credentials necessary to assure the notarial officer of the identity of the individual.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 6, effective January 1, 2020.

423.330.
Refusal to perform notarial act.

A notarial officer may refuse to perform a notarial act if the officer is not satisfied that:

The individual executing the record is competent or has the capacity to execute the record; or

The individual’s signature is knowingly and voluntarily made.

A notarial officer may refuse to perform a notarial act unless refusal is prohibited by law other than KRS

423.300

to

423.455

.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 7, effective January 1, 2020.

423.335.
Signature by proxy.

If an individual is physically unable to sign a record, the individual may direct another individual, other than the notarial officer, to sign the individual’s name on the record by proxy, in the presence of two (2) witnesses unaffected by the record, one (1) of whom may be the individual who signs, by proxy, on behalf of the individual physically unable to sign. Both witnesses shall sign their own names beside the proxy signature, and the notarial officer shall insert “Signature affixed by (name of proxy signer) at the direction of (name of individual) and in the presence of (names and addresses of the two witnesses)” or words of similar import.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 8, effective January 1, 2020.

423.340.
Who may perform notarial act — Effect of signature and title — Powers of county clerk.

A notarial act may be performed in this state by:

A notary public of this state; or

A county clerk of this state.

The signature and title of an individual performing a notarial act in this state are prima facie evidence that the signature is genuine and that the individual holds the designated title.

The signature and title of a notarial officer described in this section conclusively establishes the authority of the notarial officer to perform the notarial act.

A county clerk shall have the powers of a notarial officer in the exercise of the official functions of the office of clerk within his or her county, and the official actions of the county clerk shall not require the witness or signature of a notary public.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 9, effective January 1, 2020.

423.345.
Effect of notarial act performed in another state, under authority of tribe, or under authority of federal law.

A notarial act performed in another state has the same effect under the law of this state as if performed by a notarial officer of this state, if the act performed in that state is performed by:

A notary public of that state;

A judge, clerk, or deputy clerk of a court of that state; or

Any other individual authorized by the law of that state to perform the notarial act.

The signature and title of an individual performing a notarial act in another state are prima facie evidence that the signature is genuine and that the individual holds the designated title.

The signature and title of a notarial officer described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection conclusively establish the authority of the officer to perform the notarial act.

A notarial act performed under the authority and in the jurisdiction of a federally recognized Indian tribe has the same effect as if performed by a notarial officer of this state, if the act performed in the jurisdiction of the tribe is performed by:

A notary public of the tribe;

A judge, clerk, or deputy clerk of a court of the tribe; or

Any other individual authorized by the law of the tribe to perform the notarial act.

The signature and title of an individual performing a notarial act under the authority and in the jurisdiction of a federally recognized Indian tribe are prima facie evidence that the signature is genuine and that the individual holds the designated title.

The signature and title of a notarial officer described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection conclusively establish the authority of the notarial officer to perform the notarial act.

A notarial act performed under the authority of federal law has the same effect under the law of this state as if performed by a notarial officer of this state, if the act performed under federal law is performed by:

A judge, clerk, or deputy clerk of a court;

An individual in military service or performing duties under the authority of military service who is authorized to perform notarial acts under federal law;

An individual designated a notarizing officer by the United States Department of State for performing notarial acts overseas; or

Any other individual authorized by federal law to perform the notarial act.

The signature and title of an individual acting under federal authority and performing a notarial act are prima facie evidence that the signature is genuine and that the individual holds the designated title.

The signature and title of an officer described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection conclusively establish the authority of the officer to perform the notarial act.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 10, effective January 1, 2020.

423.350.
Effect of notarial act performed under authority of foreign state or international governmental organization — Establishing authority of officer and genuineness of signature.

In this section, “foreign state” means a government other than the United States, a state, or a federally recognized Indian tribe.

If a notarial act is performed under the authority and in the jurisdiction of a foreign state or constituent unit of the foreign state or is performed under the authority of a multinational or international governmental organization, the act has the same effect under the law of this state as if performed by a notarial officer of this state.

If the title of office and indication of authority to perform notarial acts in a foreign state appears in a digest of foreign law or in a list customarily used as a source for that information, the authority of an officer with that title to perform notarial acts is conclusively established.

The signature and official stamp of an individual holding an office described in subsection (3) of this section are prima facie evidence that the signature is genuine and the individual holds the designated title.

An apostille in the form prescribed by the Hague Convention of October 5, 1961, and issued by a foreign state party to the Convention conclusively establishes that the signature of the notarial officer is genuine and that the officer holds the indicated office.

A consular authentication issued by an individual designated by the United States Department of State as a notarizing officer for performing notarial acts overseas and attached to the record with respect to which the notarial act is performed conclusively establishes that the signature of the notarial officer is genuine and that the officer holds the indicated office.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 11, effective January 1, 2020.

423.355.
Online notary public — Electronic notarization — Refusal to perform notarial act — Use of communication technology — Registration — Administrative regulations — Application of state law.

An online notary public:

Shall be commissioned as a notary public pursuant to KRS

423.300

to

423.455

and has the powers and duties of a traditional notary public as provided by KRS

423.300

to

423.455

;

May perform notarial acts as provided by KRS 423.300 to 423.455 in addition to performing electronic notarizations; and

May, upon registration with the Secretary of State as an online notary public pursuant to KRS

423.390

, perform electronic notarizations authorized under this section.

An online notary public may perform an electronic notarization provided the online notary public is physically located in this state while performing the notarial act and if:

The online notary public has:

Personal knowledge of the identity of the individual pursuant to KRS

423.325

; or

Satisfactory evidence of the identity of the individual pursuant to KRS

423.325

(3); and

At the time of electronic notarization:

The individual appearing before the online notary public is located within this state, or elsewhere within the geographic boundaries of a state of the United States; or

The individual is located outside the United States and:

The individual confirms to the online notary public that the record is to be filed with or relates to a matter before a court, governmental entity, public official, or other entity located in the territorial jurisdiction of the United States, or relates to property located in the United States, or relates to a transaction substantially connected to the United States; and

To the online notary public’s actual knowledge, the act of making the statement or signing the record is not prohibited by the jurisdiction in which the individual is located.

In addition to the authority of a notary public to refuse to perform a notarial act pursuant to KRS

423.330

, a notary public may refuse to perform a notarial act under this section if the notary public is not satisfied that a notarial act performed would conform with subsection (2)(b)2. of this section.

If a notarial act involves a statement made in or a signature executed on an electronic record by an individual by means of communication technology, the certificate of notarial act required by KRS

423.360

shall indicate that the individual making the statement or signing the record appeared before the online notary public by means of communication technology.

For each electronic notarization, the online notary public shall:

Include, in addition to the journal entries required under KRS

423.380

, an indication of whether an individual making a statement or executing a signature which is the subject of the notarial act appeared before the online notary public in the notary’s physical presence or by means of communication technology;

Create a complete recording of the conference session containing the audio-video communication between the online notary public and individual appearing before the online notary public, in accordance with the standards adopted under subsection (7) of this section and KRS

423.415

; and

Maintain the recording described by paragraph (b) of this subsection for at least ten (10) years after the date of the applicable transaction or proceeding or for the period of retention of a notary public’s journal pursuant to KRS

423.380

, whichever is longer.

Before an online notary public performs any electronic notarizations under this section, the online notary public shall register with the Secretary of State pursuant to KRS

423.390

.

The Secretary of State may promulgate administrative regulations regarding the performance of electronic notarizations. The administrative regulations may:

Prescribe the means of performing a notarial act involving communication technology;

Establish standards for communication technology and the process of credential analysis and identity proofing;

Establish procedures for the requirements of providers of communication technology; and

Establish standards and requirements for the retention of a video and audio copy of the performance of a notarial act.

Regardless of the physical location of the individual at the time of the notarial act, the validity of an electronic notarization performed by an online notary public commissioned in this state shall be determined by applying the laws of this state.

An online notary public shall take reasonable steps to ensure that:

Any registered device or credential used to create an electronic signature is current and has not been revoked or terminated by the device’s or credential’s issuing or registering authority;

The audio-video communication used in an electronic notarization is secure from unauthorized interception or use;

A backup exists for all information pertaining to an electronic notarization required to be kept by administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to subsection (7) of this section and KRS

423.415

; and

The backup described by paragraph (c) of this subsection is secure from unauthorized use.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 12, effective January 1, 2020.

423.360.
Certificate of notarial act.

A notarial act shall be evidenced by a certificate. The certificate shall:

Be executed contemporaneously with the performance of the notarial act;

Be signed and dated by the notarial officer and, if the notarial officer is a notary public, be signed in the same manner as on file with the Secretary of State;

Identify the jurisdiction in which the notarial act is performed;

Contain the title of office and name of the notarial officer; and

If the notarial officer is a notary public, indicate the commission number and date of expiration, if there is an expiration date, of the officer’s commission.

If a notarial act is performed regarding a tangible record by a notarial officer, including a notary public, the certificate shall contain the information specified in paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) of subsection (1) of this section, along with the additional information in paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of this section, if the certificate is completed by a notary public. An official stamp may be affixed to or embossed on the certificate. If a notarial act regarding an electronic record is performed by a notarial officer, the certificate shall contain the information specified in paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) of subsection (1) of this section, along with the additional information in paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of this section if the certificate is completed by a notary public. An official stamp may be attached to or logically associated with the certificate.

A certificate of a notarial act is sufficient if it meets the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section and:

Is in a short form set forth in KRS

423.365

;

Is in a form otherwise permitted by the laws of this state;

Is in a form permitted by the law applicable in the jurisdiction in which the notarial act was performed; or

Sets forth the actions of the notarial officer and the actions are sufficient to meet the requirements of the notarial act as provided in KRS

423.300

to

423.455

or other law of this state other than KRS

423.300

to

423.455

.

By executing a certificate of a notarial act, a notarial officer certifies that the officer has complied with the requirements and made the determinations specified in KRS

423.300

to

423.455

.

A notarial officer may not affix the officer’s signature to, or logically associate it with, a certificate until the notarial act has been performed.

If a notarial act is performed regarding a tangible record, a certificate shall be part of, or securely attached to, the record. If a notarial act is performed regarding an electronic record, the certificate shall be affixed to, or logically associated with, the electronic record. If the Secretary of State has established standards pursuant to KRS

423.415

for attaching, affixing, or logically associating the certificate, the process shall conform to the standards.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 13, effective January 1, 2020.

423.365.
Short-form certificate.

The Secretary of State shall promulgate short-form certificates for notarial acts which shall contain space for the information required by KRS 423.360(1) and (2), and include a space to indicate the manner of notarization of the document.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 14, effective January 1, 2020.

423.370.
Stamp.

A notary public commissioned pursuant to KRS

423.300

to

423.455

is not required to use a stamp. If a notary public chooses to use a stamp, the notary public shall have an official stamp which shall:

Include the notary public’s name, title, jurisdiction, commission number, and expiration date; and

Be capable of being copied together with the record to which it is affixed or attached or with which it is logically associated.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 15, effective January 1, 2020.

423.375.
Security of stamping device — Rendering unusable when no longer valid — Lost or stolen device.

A notary public is responsible for the security of the notary public’s stamping device and may not allow another individual to use the device to perform a notarial act. On resignation from, or the revocation or expiration of, the notary public’s commission, or on the expiration of the date set forth in the stamping device, if any, the notary public shall disable the stamping device by destroying, defacing, damaging, erasing, or securing it against use in a manner that renders it unusable. On the death or adjudication of incompetency of a notary public, the notary public’s personal representative or guardian or any other person knowingly in possession of the stamping device shall render it unusable by destroying, defacing, damaging, erasing, or securing it against use in a manner that renders it unusable.

If a notary public’s stamping device is lost or stolen, the notary public or the notary public’s personal representative or guardian shall notify promptly the Secretary of State on discovering that the device is lost or stolen.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 86, § 16, effective January 1, 2020.